apertium-mwl.mwl.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Mirandese

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <pro>
# <gend>   # Gender
# <ij>     # Interjection
# <np>     # Proper noun
# <top>    # Toponym
# <ant>    # Anthroponym
# <for>    # Foreign word
# <acr>    # Acronym

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular
# <sp>     # Sing and Plur
# <numw>   # Number Word

# Gender morphology
# <m>      # Masculine
# <f>      # Feminine
# <mf>     # Masculine and Feminine

# verb morphology
# <tv>     # Transitive verb
# <pri>    # Present
# <past>   # Past
# <fut>    # Future
# <fts>    # Future subjunctive
# <p1>     # First person
# <p2>     # Second person
# <p3>     # Third person
# <inf>    # Infinitive
# <vblex>
# <vbser>

# Pronoun morphology
# <pers>   # Personal
# <subj>   # Subjective
# <pos>    # Possessive
# <obj>    # Object
# <ido>    # Indirect object
# <itg>    # Interrogative
# <tn>     # Tonic

# Adjective morphology
# <prx>    # Proximate
# <med>    # Medial
# <dst>    # Distal

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Inflection patterns
(NounRoot RegNounInfl)[^[M,F]]
(AdjRoot RegAdjInfl)[^[M,F]]
AdvRoot RegAdvInfl
IjRoot RegIjInfl
PrnRoot
# Make infinitives
(v-Stem [<vblex><inf>:] Infin)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-SimplePresentIndicative)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-SimplePastIndicative)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-ImperfectIndicative)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-PluperfectIndicative)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-ImperfectSubjunctive)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] Infin v-SimpleFutureIndicative)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] Infin v-SimpleFutureSubjunctive)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] Infin v-Conditional)[^[AR,ER,IR]]
(v-Stem [<vblex>:] v-Gerund)[^[AR,ER,IR]]

Preposition
Determiner
Irregular-verb
Conjunction
Contraction
Number
NumberWord
Punctuation
NP_Symbol
PossAdjective
DemAdjective
ForeignWord
IndAdjective
Acronym

## Example inflection lexicon:
LEXICON RegNounInfl
<n><m><sg>:[M]
<n><f><sg>:[F]
<n><m><pl>:>{e}s[M]
<n><f><pl>:>{e}s[F]

LEXICON RegAdjInfl
<adj><m><sg>:[M]
<adj><f><sg>:[F]
<adj><m><pl>:>{e}s[M]
<adj><f><pl>:>{e}s[F]

LEXICON RegAdvInfl
<adv>:

LEXICON RegIjInfl
<ij>:

LEXICON v-Stem
quedar:qued[AR]
screbir:screb[IR]
dezir:dez[IR]
ancluir:anclu[IR]
falar:fal[AR]
deber:deb[ER]
eisistir:eisist[IR]
digerir:diger[IR]
deber:deb[ER]
bibir:bib[IR]
chamar:cham[AR]
aplicar:aplic[AR]
nutrir:nutr[IR]
cumprir:cumpr[IR]
porteger:porteg[ER]
regular:regul[AR]

agir:ag[IR]
abolir:abol[IR]
abrir:abr[IR]
abrirumespaço:abrirumespaço
abrogar:abrog[AR]
abalar:abal[AR]
abalizar:abaliz[AR]
abandonar:abandon[AR]
abarcar:abarc[AR]
abarbarizar:abarbariz[AR]
abastecer:abastec[ER]
abater:abat[ER]
abdicar:abdic[AR]
abençoar:abenço[AR]
abismar:abism[AR]
abordar:abord[AR]
aborreçar:aborreç[AR]
abortar:abort[AR]
abraçar:abraç[AR]
abranger:abrang[ER]
abrandar:abrand[AR]
abrasar:abras[AR]
abrebiar:abrebi[AR]
abrigar:abrig[AR]
absolber:absolb[ER]
absorber:absorb[ER]
abster:abst[ER]
abstrair:abstra[IR]
abundar:abund[AR]
abusar:abus[AR]
acabar:acab[AR]
acalmar:acalm[AR]
acampar:acamp[AR]
acariciar:acarici[AR]
acarretar:acarret[AR]
acatar:acat[AR]
accionar:accion[AR]
aceder:aced[ER]
aceitar:aceit[AR]
acelerar:aceler[AR]
acender:acend[ER]
acentuar:acentu[AR]
acercar:acerc[AR]
acertar:acert[AR]
acessar:acess[AR]
acetificar:acetific[AR]
achar:ach[AR]
acharque:acharque
acidentar:acident[AR]
acidificar:acidific[AR]
acionar:acion[AR]
aclamar:aclam[AR]
aclarar:aclar[AR]
aclerizar:acleriz[AR]
aclimatar:aclimat[AR]
aclimatizar:aclimatiz[AR]
acolher:acolh[ER]
acumeter:acumet[ER]
acumodar:acumod[AR]
acumpanhar:acumpanh[AR]
acunselhar:acunselh[AR]
acuntecer:acuntec[ER]
acoplar:acopl[AR]
acordar:acord[AR]
acossar:acoss[AR]
acostumar:acostum[AR]
acrecentar:acrecent[AR]
acreditar:acredit[AR]
acrescentar:acrescent[AR]
acromatizar:acromatiz[AR]
atibar:atib[AR]
atuar:atu[AR]
atualizar:atualiz[AR]
acumular:acumul[AR]
acusar:acus[AR]
aderir:ader[IR]
adatar:adat[AR]
adequar:adequ[AR]
adiar:adi[AR]
adiantar:adiant[AR]
adicionar:adicion[AR]
adibinhar:adibinh[AR]
adjudicar:adjudic[AR]
administrar:administr[AR]
admirar:admir[AR]
admitir:admit[IR]
admoestar:admoest[AR]
adotar:adot[AR]
adorar:ador[AR]
adormecer:adormec[ER]
adotar:adot[AR]
adquirir:adquir[IR]
desiludir:desilud[IR]
adulterar:adulter[AR]
adbertir:adbert[IR]
adbir:adb[IR]
adberbializar:adberbializ[AR]
aerizar:aeriz[AR]
afastar:afast[AR]
afetar:afet[AR]
afetar:afet[AR]
afiar:afi[AR]
afirmar:afirm[AR]
afligir:aflig[IR]
aflorar:aflor[AR]
afogar:afog[AR]
aforrar:aforr[AR]
afrancesar:afrances[AR]
africanizar:africaniz[AR]
afugentar:afugent[AR]
afundar:afund[AR]
agachar:agach[AR]
agarrar:agarr[AR]
agastar:agast[AR]
agilizar:agiliz[AR]
agitar:agit[AR]
aglutinar:aglutin[AR]
agonizar:agoniz[AR]
agredir:agred[IR]
agraciar:agraci[AR]
agradar:agrad[AR]
agradecer:agradec[ER]
agrabar:agrab[AR]
agregar:agreg[AR]
agrupar:agrup[AR]
aguçar:aguç[AR]
aguardar:aguard[AR]
agudizar:agudiz[AR]
aguentar:aguent[AR]
aguilhoar:aguilho[AR]
agüentar:agüent[AR]
ajoelhar:ajoelh[AR]
ajudar:ajud[AR]
ajuizar:ajuiz[AR]
ajustar:ajust[AR]
alçar:alç[AR]
alabar:alab[AR]
alabastrizar:alabastriz[AR]
alambicar:alambic[AR]
alargar:alarg[AR]
alarmar:alarm[AR]
alabancar:alabanc[AR]
albergar:alberg[AR]
alcalinizar:alcaliniz[AR]
alcalizar:alcaliz[AR]
alcançar:alcanç[AR]
alcoolizar:alcooliz[AR]
alegar:aleg[AR]
alegorizar:alegoriz[AR]
alegrar:alegr[AR]
alentar:alent[AR]
alertar:alert[AR]
alfabetizar:alfabetiz[AR]
algebrizar:algebriz[AR]
aliar:ali[AR]
alienar:alien[AR]
alimentar:aliment[AR]
alinhar:alinh[AR]
alinhar:alinh[AR]
alibiar:alibi[AR]
almejar:almej[AR]
almoçar:almoç[AR]
alojar:aloj[AR]
alongar:along[AR]
alopatizar:alopatiz[AR]
alterar:alter[AR]
alterarpara:alterarpara
alternar:altern[AR]
alternar:altern[AR]
alucinar:alucin[AR]
aludir:alud[IR]
alugar:alug[AR]
alumiar:alumi[AR]
alboroçar:alboroç[AR]
amar:am[AR]
amaldiçoar:amaldiço[AR]
amanhecer:amanhec[ER]
amantizar:amantiz[AR]
amargurar:amargur[AR]
amassar:amass[AR]
ambientar:ambient[AR]
ameaçar:ameaç[AR]
amenizar:ameniz[AR]
americanizar:americaniz[AR]
amigar:amig[AR]
amnistiar:amnisti[AR]
amoldar:amold[AR]
amoralizar:amoraliz[AR]
amortecer:amortec[ER]
amortizar:amortiz[AR]
amotinar:amotin[AR]
amparar:ampar[AR]
ampliar:ampli[AR]
amplificar:amplific[AR]
amputar:amput[AR]
anacreontizar:anacreontiz[AR]
anacronizar:anacroniz[AR]
anagramatizar:anagramatiz[AR]
analgizar:analgiz[AR]
analisar:analis[AR]
anarquizar:anarquiz[AR]
anatematizar:anatematiz[AR]
anatomizar:anatomiz[AR]
ancorar:ancor[AR]
andar:and[AR]
anedotizar:anedotiz[AR]
anemizar:anemiz[AR]
anestesiar:anestesi[AR]
anexar:anex[AR]
angelizar:angeliz[AR]
anglicizar:angliciz[AR]
anglomanizar:anglomaniz[AR]
angustiar:angusti[AR]
animar:anim[AR]
animalizar:animaliz[AR]
aninhar:aninh[AR]
aniquilar:aniquil[AR]
anisar:anis[AR]
anistiar:anisti[AR]
anotar:anot[AR]
anquilosar:anquilos[AR]
ansiar:ansi[AR]
antagonizar:antagoniz[AR]
anteceder:anteced[ER]
antecipar:antecip[AR]
